Missouri, session 2026, HB2790.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 56.190 and 540.106, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 56.190 and 540.106, to read as follows:
56.190. In all counties [of class one], the stenographers in the office of the
prosecuting attorney shall[, when so directed by the prosecuting attorney of such county,] take
down and transcribe for the use of the prosecuting attorney testimony and evidence before the
grand jury of said county and before any court of said county exercising criminal jurisdiction
or before the coroner of said county at any inquest held on any homicide or felony inquiry,
and shall perform such other duties in the office of the prosecuting attorney as may be
necessary. Before taking down any evidence before the grand jury, such stenographers shall
be sworn to keep secret any fact disclosed in said grand jury room, and shall not divulge any
testimony which he or she may have heard there, except to the prosecuting attorney or when
lawfully required to do so by a court of record having jurisdiction in said matter. Any
information transcribed under this section shall be discoverable so long as all privileged
information is redacted.
540.106. [Any] Each grand jury [proceeding that includes] proceeding, including
any proceeding that involves testimony or other information from a witness who is granted
immunity from prosecution, shall be a recorded proceeding. In the event a person is indicted
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2790 2
as a result of such immunized testimony, the prosecutor shall provide a transcription of such
testimony to all defendants.
✔